Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.05.050

Recommendation to congress.

In accordance with the U.S. Constitution, the voters of the state of Washington urge the Washington state congressional delegation, and the U.S. congress generally, to include an amendment ratification method which will best ensure that the people are heard and represented during the ratification process.

[ 2017 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 735, approved November 8, 2016).]